New Jersey, session 221, A681.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.    , c.  , the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 34 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance STATE AID 03-5120 Miscellaneous Grants-In-Aid................................ $3,500,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance .. $3,500,000 State Aid: 03    Freehold Regional School District.......... $3,500,000 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.